Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1509
Appeal; procedure.

An appeal may be taken from any final decision of the director, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1971, LB 939, § 9;

Laws 1972, LB 1435, § 8;

Laws 1974, LB 1029, § 6;

Laws 1979, LB 321, § 3;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 174.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.

For the purposes of this section, no final decision has been rendered unless a complaint has first been issued by the Director of Environmental Quality. State ex rel. Wood v. Fisher Foods, Ltd., 254 Neb. 982, 581 N.W.2d 409 (1998).